California statutes. Education Code
(a) For all adults with disabilities educated by the county superintendent of schools, for all secondary schools maintained in juvenile halls, juvenile homes, and juvenile camps by the county superintendent of schools, and for all pupils enrolled in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, in opportunity schools and classes and all continuation schools and classes maintained by the county superintendent of schools, the Superintendent shall allow the same amount as he or she would compute for the foundation program of a high school district under Section 41712.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the total of allowances for education of adults with disabilities in classes established by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to Section 52570 or 78440 shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in any one fiscal year. The Superintendent shall establish a system of priorities that he or she shall by rule or regulation adopt that shall give highest priority to those counties in which no program or an insufficient program for the education of adults with disabilities is provided by the school districts within the county, in order to comply with the limitation prescribed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Local Taxation by School Districts and Community College Districts [14220. - 14401.1.]



  ARTICLE 2. Taxes on School Districts Located in Two or More Counties [14220. - 14226.]

14220.

When any school district or community college district is situated partly in two or more counties the assessor of each of the counties shall annually certify to the board of supervisors of each of the counties the assessed value of all taxable property in the county situated in the district as shown by the last assessment roll of his county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

14221.

The certificate of the assessor shall be made in the same manner and at the same time as is required for school districts or community college districts located wholly within the boundaries of one county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

14222.

The board of supervisors of each county, after receiving the certificate of the assessor, shall thereupon determine the rate of taxation necessary to be levied upon the property in the school district or community college district situated in the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

14223.

The rate of taxation shall be sufficient to meet the proportion of taxes necessary to be raised in the county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest of the bonds of the district and all other expenses of the district as shown by the estimate of the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

14224.

The taxes shall be assessed, levied, and collected in the same manner and at the same time as county taxes are assessed, levied, and collected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

14225.

The money received shall be deposited in the county treasury of the county whose superintendent of schools has jurisdiction over the school district or community college district, and such county treasury shall be the legal depository of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

14226.

The money deposited shall be placed in the school fund of the school district or community college district to be expended in the same manner as money of other districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Disputed Revenues of School Districts [14240. - 14401.1.]

14240.

The county auditor may impound the disputed revenues of school district or community college district taxes, upon secured or unsecured property, levied and collected in the 1954–1955 fiscal year, and thereafter, whenever, pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 5096) of Part 9 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, a claim or action is filed for the return of those revenues, or the taxes have been paid under protest. The county auditor may continue to impound the revenues until the final disposition of the claim or action. If, under the final disposition, it is determined that the taxes were properly levied against the property, the auditor shall release the revenues to the school district or community college district, and the auditor shall thereupon immediately notify, in writing, the Superintendent of Public Instruction or board of governors, as the case may be, of the release.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

14401.1.

Of the amounts appropriated in the items listed in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42605 that are contained in the annual Budget Act, payments equal to 5 percent of the total amount appropriated in those items shall be made for the months of July and August. Payments for the months of September to June, inclusive, shall be equal to 9 percent of the total amount appropriated in those items.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 23, Sec. 3.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Financial and Compliance Audits [14500. - 14509.]

14500.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to promote accountability over public educational funding by establishing a new program to review and report on financial and compliance audits of school districts, educational joint powers authorities, county superintendents of schools, and charter schools. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the Controller shall have the primary responsibility for implementing and overseeing the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 23.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14501.

(a) As used in this chapter, “financial and compliance audit” shall be consistent with the definition provided in the
generally accepted government auditing standards promulgated by the United States Government Accountability Office.
 Financial and compliance audits conducted under this chapter shall fulfill federal single audit requirements.

(b) For purposes of this chapter,
 the following definitions apply:

(1) “Compliance audit” means an audit that ascertains and verifies whether or not funds provided through apportionment, contract, or grant, either federal or state, have been properly disbursed and expended as required by law or regulation, or both, and includes the verification of each of the
 following:

(A) Expenditure of funds in accordance with the local control and accountability plan adopted pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 52059.5) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(B) The reporting requirements for the sufficiency of textbooks or instructional materials, or both, as defined in
 Section 60119.

(C) Teacher misassignments pursuant to Section 44258.9.

(D) The accuracy of information reported on the School Accountability Report Card required by Section 33126.

(2) “Educational joint powers authority” means an entity described in subdivision (a) of Section 41023 that is formed pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(3) “Local educational agency” means a school district, educational joint powers authority, charter school, or county superintendent of schools.

(c) The requirements set forth in subparagraphs (B) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1)
 of subdivision (b)
 shall be added to the audit guide requirements pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14502.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 24.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14502.1.

(a) The Controller, in consultation with the Department of Finance and the department, shall develop a plan to review and report on financial and compliance audits. The plan shall commence with the 2003–04 fiscal year for audits of school districts, other local educational agencies, and the offices of county superintendents of schools. The Controller, in consultation with the Department of Finance, the department, and representatives of the California School Boards Association, the California Association of School Business Officials, the California County Superintendents Educational Services Association, the California Teachers Association, the California School Employees Association, the California Society of
 Certified Public Accountants,
 the California Charter Schools Association, and the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, shall recommend the statements and other information to be included in the audit reports filed with the state, and shall propose the content of an audit guide to carry out the purposes of this chapter. A supplement to the audit guide may be suggested in the audit year, following the above process, to address issues resulting from new legislation in that year that changes the conditions of apportionment. The proposed content of the audit guide and any supplement to the audit guide shall be submitted by the Controller to the Education Audit Appeals Panel for review and possible amendment.

(b) The audit guide and any supplement shall be adopted by the Education Audit Appeals Panel pursuant to the rulemaking procedures of the Administrative Procedure Act, as set forth in Chapter 3.5 (commencing
 with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. It is the intent of the Legislature that, for the 2003–04 fiscal year, the audit guide be adopted by July 1 of the fiscal year to be audited. A supplemental audit guide may be adopted to address legislative changes to the conditions of apportionment. It is the intent of the Legislature that supplements be adopted before March 1 of the audit year. Commencing with the 2004–05 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the audit guide shall be adopted by July 1 of the fiscal year to be audited. A supplemental audit guide may be adopted to address legislative changes to the conditions of apportionment. The supplements shall be adopted before March 1 of the audit year. To meet these goals and to ensure the accuracy of the audit guide, the process for adopting emergency regulations set forth in Section 11346.1 of the Government Code may be followed to adopt the audit guide and supplemental audit guide. It is the intent of the
 Legislature that once the audit guide has been adopted for a fiscal year, as well as any supplement for that year, thereafter only suggested changes to the audit guide and any additional supplements need be adopted pursuant to the rulemaking procedures of the Administrative Procedure Act. The audit guide and any supplement shall be issued in booklet form and may be made available by any means deemed appropriate. The Controller and consultants in the development of the suggested audit guide and any supplement shall work cooperatively on a timeline that will allow the Education Audit Appeals Panel to meet the July 1 and March 1 issuance dates. Consistent with current practices for development of the audit guide before the 2003–04 fiscal year, the Controller shall provide for the adoption of procedures and timetables for the development of the suggested audit guide, any supplement, and the format for additions, deletions, and revisions.

(c) For
 the audit of school districts or county offices of education electing to take formal action pursuant to Sections 22714 and 44929, the audit guide content proposed by the Controller shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The number and type of positions vacated.

(2) The age and service credit of the retirees receiving the additional service credit provided by Sections 22714 and 44929.

(3) A comparison of the salary and benefits of each retiree receiving the additional service credit with the salary and benefits of the replacement employee, if any.

(4) The resulting retirement cost, including interest, if any, and postretirement health care benefits costs, incurred by the employer.

(d) The Controller shall annually prepare a cost analysis, based on the information included in the audit reports for the prior fiscal year, to determine the net savings or costs resulting from formal actions taken by school districts and county offices of education pursuant to Sections 22714 and 44929, and shall report the results of the cost analysis to the Governor and the Legislature by April 1 of each year.

(e) All costs incurred by the Controller to implement subdivision (c) shall be absorbed by the Controller.

(f) On or before January 1, 2015, the Controller, in consultation with the State Allocation Board, the Department of Finance, and the department, shall submit content to the Education Audit Appeals Panel to be included in the audit guide, Standards and Procedures for Audits of California K-12 Local Educational Agencies beginning in the 2015–16 fiscal
 year, that is related to the financial and performance audits required for school facility projects, as described in Section 15286.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 25.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14503.

Financial and compliance audits shall be performed in accordance with
the generally accepted government auditing standards promulgated by the United States Government Accountability Office for financial and compliance
 audits and in accordance with the filing deadlines established pursuant to Sections 41020 and 41020.2. The audit guide prepared by the Controller shall be used in the performance of these audits until an audit guide is adopted by the Education Audit Appeals Panel pursuant to Section 14502.1. When an audit guide is adopted by that panel, the adopted audit guide shall be used in the performance of these audits. Every audit report shall specifically and separately address each of the state program compliance requirements included in the audit guide, stating whether or not the
 local educational agency is in compliance with those requirements. For each state program compliance requirement included in the audit guide, every audit report shall further state that the suggested audit procedures included in the audit guide for that requirement were followed in the making of the audit, if that is the case, or, if not, what other procedures were followed. If a local educational agency is not in compliance with a requirement that is a condition of eligibility for the receipt of state funds, the audit report shall include a statement of the number of units of average daily attendance, if any, that were inappropriately reported for apportionment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 26.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14504.

(a) (1) To determine the practicability and effectiveness of the audits and audit guide, the Controller shall, on an annual basis, review and monitor the audit reports performed by independent auditors.

(2) (A) The
 Controller shall determine whether audit reports are in conformance with the reporting provisions of Section 14503 and shall notify each local educational agency, the responsible chartering authority if applicable, the responsible county superintendent of schools, the
 Superintendent,
 the Department of Finance, and the auditor
 within six months of the audit report due date or the audit report issue date, whichever is later, regarding each determination.

(B) The local educational agency, the chartering authority, the county superintendent of schools, or the Superintendent contracting for the financial and compliance audit shall include a statement that will provide the Controller access to audit working papers.

(b) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year, the Controller’s desk review checklist that is used to determine whether audit reports are in conformance with the reporting requirements of Section 14503 shall be published on or before October 31 of each year, or 30 days
 following the release of the annual federal compliance supplement for Single Audit Act audits, whichever is later. The Controller’s desk review checklist shall focus on elements of reporting that are material, whether qualitative or quantitative, and areas with a higher risk of error or misstatement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 27.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14504.2.

(a) The Controller may perform quality control reviews of audit working papers to determine whether audits are performed in conformity with Section 14503. The Department of Finance or the Superintendent may refer an independent auditor of a local educational agency to the Controller for a review pursuant to this section if the Department of Finance
 or the Superintendent finds that an audit of a
 local educational agency was conducted in a manner that may constitute noncompliance with Section 14503. The Controller shall communicate the results of the Controller’s reviews to the entity that referred the independent auditor to the Controller, the independent auditor, and the
 local educational agency
 for which the audit was performed, and shall review the Controller’s findings with the independent auditor.

(b) (1) Prior to the performance of any quality control reviews, the Controller shall develop and publish guidelines and standards for those reviews. Pursuant to the development of those guidelines and standards, the Controller shall provide opportunity for public comment.

(2) The Controller shall establish and publish as part of the audit guidelines a weighted risk-based criteria that considers auditor experience and quality factors in determining which audit engagements shall undergo a quality control review. Criteria shall include, but not be limited
 to, all of the following:

(A) Audit reports that were found to have material nonconformance to the reporting provisions of Section 14503 through the Controller’s review.

(B) Audits conducted by an engagement partner who has not performed audits of local educational agencies in the preceding three years.

(C) Audits that are submitted after the due date established pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 41020, or an approved extension date, whichever is later.

(3) If the quality control review of the Controller indicates that the audit was conducted in a manner that may constitute unprofessional conduct, as defined pursuant to Section 5100 of the Business and Professions Code, including, but not limited to, gross negligence resulting in a material misstatement in the audit, the Controller shall refer the case to the California Board of Accountancy. If the California Board of Accountancy finds that the independent auditor conducted an audit in an unprofessional manner, the independent auditor is prohibited from performing any audit of a local
 educational agency for a period of three years, in addition to any other penalties that the California Board of Accountancy may impose.

(c) In any matter that is referred to the California Board of Accountancy under paragraph (3) of subdivision
 (b), the Controller may suspend the independent auditor from performing any local educational agency audits pending final disposition of the matter by the California Board of Accountancy if the Controller gives the independent auditor notice and an opportunity to respond to that suspension. The independent auditor shall be given credit for any period of suspension if the California Board of Accountancy prohibits the independent auditor from performing audits of the local educational agency under
 paragraph (3) of subdivision (b). The Controller shall not suspend an independent auditor under this subdivision for a period of longer than three years.

(d) The county superintendent of schools, the school district, the charter school, the chartering authority, the Controller, or the Superintendent may refer an independent auditor of a local educational agency to the California Board of Accountancy for action described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) if any of the following circumstances
 exist:

(1) An audit of a local educational agency was conducted in a manner that may constitute unprofessional
 conduct, as defined by Section 5100 of the Business and Professions Code, including, but not limited to, gross negligence resulting in a material misstatement in the audit.

(2) Material deficiencies are discovered in the quality control review conducted pursuant to this section.

(3) The continuing education requirements of Section 41020 are not met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 28.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14505.

(a) The governing board or body of a local educational agency shall include both of the following provisions in their contracts for audits:

(1) A provision to withhold 10 percent of the audit fee until the Controller certifies that the audit report conforms to the reporting provisions of Section 14503.

(2) A provision to withhold 50 percent of the audit fee for any subsequent year of a multiyear contract if the prior year’s audit report was not certified as conforming to
 the reporting provisions
 of Section 14503. This provision shall include a statement that a multiyear contract will be null and void if a firm or individual is declared ineligible pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 41020.5. The amount withheld is not payable unless payment is ordered by the California Board of Accountancy or the audit report for that subsequent year is certified by the Controller as conforming to the reporting provisions of Section 14503.

(b) If the Controller has not provided a written certification that the audit report has conformed to the reporting provisions of Section 14503 or a written rejection letter detailing the exceptions noted by
 the Controller’s review with instructions for corrections by the sixth month following the date that the audit is received by the Controller, or the audit due date, whichever is later, the governing board or body of the local educational agency may release the amounts withheld in audit fees pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(c) Within 30 days from the date of receipt of written notification that the Controller refuses to certify an audit report as conforming to the reporting provisions of Section 14503, an auditor or audit firm having a portion of an audit fee withheld pursuant to these provisions may file an appeal in writing with the California Board of Accountancy. The
 California Board of Accountancy
 shall complete an investigation of the appeal within 90 days of the filing date and, on the basis of the investigation, do either of the following:

(1) Order the Controller to provide notification that the audit report conforms to the reporting provisions of Section 14503.

(2) Schedule the appeal for a hearing, in which case the final action on the appeal shall be completed by the California Board of Accountancy within one year from the date of filing the
 appeal.

(d) If the
 California Board of Accountancy orders the Controller to provide notification
 pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), the Controller shall notify the contracting local educational agency which shall then release the portion of the audit fee being withheld in accordance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 29.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14506.

The Controller shall conduct any additional audits that are necessary to carry out the Controller’s duties and responsibilities pursuant to this code and the Government Code.
 This chapter does not authorize a local educational agency, or a subcontractor or subrecipient, to constrain, in any manner, the Controller from carrying out additional audits. To the extent that the required financial and compliance audits provide the Controller with the information necessary
 to carry out
 the Controller’s responsibilities, the Controller shall plan additional audits as appropriate to avoid unnecessary duplication of audit efforts. In performing additional audits, the Controller shall, to the extent deemed appropriate under the circumstances, build upon the work performed during the required financial and compliance audit. The Controller shall not bill the local educational agency for the costs of these additional audits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 30.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14507.

The Controller shall report to the Superintendent on or before August 31 of each year in order to apprise the Superintendent of those local educational agencies that are not in compliance with the applicable statutes and regulations. The Controller’s report shall categorize audit exception by types and shall identify the reasons for the
 exceptions. The reasons may be the legislative intent or language is unclear or the administrative requirement is not feasible. The Controller shall make recommendations as to what action should be taken by the Superintendent. Before issuing the report, the Controller shall allow each local educational agency that is specified in the report a reasonable period of time to review and comment on the section of the report affecting
 that local educational agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 31.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14508.

Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the Controller shall submit a report, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature on or before August 31 of each year regarding any recommendations made to the
 Superintendent pursuant to Section 14507.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 32.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14509.

The funding appropriated in Item 6100-161-0001 of the annual Budget Act for mental health services shall be subject to existing state and federal audit requirements. Audit procedures shall be included in the audit guide to review whether funding for educationally related mental health services pursuant to this item was used by local educational agencies for its intended purposes in the 2016–17 fiscal year. These audit procedures shall be included in future fiscal years if the addition of these procedures is recommended by the Controller pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14502.1. If any mental health audit findings are generated through this process, the Superintendent shall ensure that the local educational agency has either corrected or developed a plan of correction for state and federal mental health funds pursuant to subdivision
 (o) of Section 41020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 33.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Retention of Local Obligations [14550. - 14550.]

14550.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a local education agency’s obligations pursuant to law may not be avoided through participation in a joint powers authority.

(b) A local education agency’s financial obligations to the state may not be avoided through participation in a joint powers authority.

(c) A local education agency’s participation in a joint powers authority may not relieve the local education agency of any financial obligation or responsibility in such a way as to shift costs or liability to the state unless the state entity undertaking the obligation is a party to the joint powers agreement and expressly agrees in the agreement to undertake the obligation.

(d) A local educational entity retains ultimate responsibility over its obligations in case of default by a joint powers authority in which it participates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 71, Sec. 9.   Effective July 5, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 9.3. THE CALIFORNIA STATE LOTTERY EDUCATION FUND [14600. - 14600.]

14600.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that one purpose of the California State Lottery Act of 1984 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 8880) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code) was to provide school districts, county offices of education, and community college districts with additional funds free of state control.

(b) In order to further the purpose identified in subdivision (a), the expenditure of funds received by a school district, county office of education, or community college district pursuant to Section 8880.5 of the Government Code shall not be subject to state control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 872, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 9.5. CALIFORNIA STATE LOTTERY EDUCATION FUND [14700. - 14701.]

14700.

Funds allocated to any public educational entity from the California State Lottery Education Fund, pursuant to Section 8880.5 of the Government Code, may be used by that entity at its discretion in conformity with Section 8880.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1052, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14701.

The Legislature recognizes that the amount of lottery revenues may fluctuate over time. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature that no additional funds be provided in order to offset any decline in lottery revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1052, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 10. SCHOOL BONDS [15100. - 17204.]



  CHAPTER 1. Bonds of School Districts and Community College Districts [15100. - 15262.]



  ARTICLE 1. Purposes for Authorizing Bonds [15100. - 15111.]

15100.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, the governing board of any school district or community college district may, when in its judgment it is advisable, and shall, upon a petition of the majority of the qualified electors residing in the school district or community college district, order an election and submit to the electors of the school district or community college district, as applicable, the question whether the bonds of the school district or community college district shall be issued and sold for the purpose of raising money for the following purposes:

(1) The purchasing of school lots.

(2) The building or purchasing of school buildings.

(3) The making of alterations or additions to the school building or buildings other than as may be necessary for current maintenance, operation, or repairs.

(4) The repairing, restoring, or rebuilding of any school building damaged, injured, or destroyed by fire or other public calamity.

(5) The supplying of school buildings and grounds with furniture, equipment, or necessary apparatus of a permanent nature.

(6) The permanent improvement of the school grounds.

(7) The refunding of any outstanding valid indebtedness of the school district or
 community college district, evidenced by bonds, or of state school building aid loans.

(8) The carrying out of the projects or purposes authorized in Section 17577.

(9) The purchase of schoolbuses the useful life of which is at least 20 years.

(10) The demolition or razing of any school building with the intent to replace it with another school building, whether in the same location or in any other location.

(b) Any one or more of the purposes enumerated in subdivision (a), except that of refunding any outstanding valid indebtedness of the school district or community college district evidenced by bonds, may, by order of the governing board of the school
 district or community college district, as applicable, that is entered in its minutes, be united and voted upon as one single proposition.

(c) Before the governing board of a school district or the governing board of a community college district may order an election for purposes of this section, it shall obtain reasonable and informed projections of assessed property valuations that take into consideration projections of assessed property valuations made by the county assessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   (AB 2116)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15100.3.

(a) Two or more small school districts that have had the issuance of bonds authorized by the voters pursuant to this chapter may form a joint powers authority in accordance with the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for the purpose of issuing or selling those bonds for
 raising money for the purposes authorized.

(b) A joint powers authority described in subdivision (a) shall be deemed a school district for purposes of this chapter only and may exercise all authority granted to a school district under this chapter under the conditions imposed by this
 chapter for the issuance and sale of bonds.

(c) Each small school district shall be responsible for its respective voter-approved bonds pursuant to this chapter. A joint powers authority formed pursuant to this section shall serve the purpose of sharing administrative costs associated with the issuance and sale of bonds and shall not otherwise affect the terms of the respective voter-approved bonds.

(d) For purposes of this section, “small school district” means a school district with fewer than 2,501 units of average daily attendance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 451, Sec. 1.   (AB 1550)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

15100.5.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the governing board of the Peralta Community College District may, when in its judgment it is advisable, order the county superintendent of schools to call an election to be conducted pursuant to this chapter and submit to the electors of the district the question of whether the proceeds of previously authorized but unissued bonds of the district may be used for a purpose or purposes in addition to the purposes for which the previously approved bonds were authorized by the electors.

The governing board may, by order entered into its minutes, call for an election to expand the purposes of prior authorized but unissued bonds either as a single proposition on the ballot or combined with the question of issuing new bonds of the district for any purpose or purposes permitted by law.

If two-thirds of the votes cast on the question of expanding the purposes for which the proceeds of previously authorized but unissued bonds of the district may be used, or the combined question of expanding the purposes for which the proceeds of previously authorized but unissued bonds of the district and issuing newly authorized bonds of the district, are in favor of the proposition, the district may use the proceeds of the previously authorized but unissued bonds for the expanded purposes and may issue newly authorized bonds, as the case may be.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15101.

Notwithstanding any other law, an election may not be held pursuant to this chapter within 45 days before a statewide election or within 45 days after a statewide election unless conducted at the same time as the statewide election, subject to Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10 of the Elections Code, or on an established election date pursuant to Section 1000 or 1500 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 289, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

15101.75.

(a) This chapter shall apply to bond elections for and the issuance of bonds for school facilities improvement districts created pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15300) to the extent that this chapter does not conflict with Chapter 2. In the event of a conflict, the provisions of Chapter 2 shall supersede the provisions of this chapter, but only to the extent of the conflict.

(b) A bond adopted by the voters pursuant to this part prior to January 1, 2008, shall be governed by this part as it read on December 31, 2007.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15102.

The total amount of bonds issued pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 15264) shall not exceed 1.25 percent of the taxable property of the school district or community college district, or the school facilities improvement district, if applicable, as shown by the last equalized assessment of the county or counties in which the district is located. For purposes of this section, the taxable property of a district for any fiscal year shall be calculated to include, but not be limited to, the assessed value of all unitary and operating nonunitary property of the district, which shall be derived by dividing the gross assessed value of the unitary and operating nonunitary property within the district for the 1987–88 fiscal year by the gross assessed value of all unitary and operating nonunitary property within the county in which the district is located for the 1987–88 fiscal year, and multiplying that result by the gross assessed value of all unitary and operating nonunitary property of the county on the last equalized assessment roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15103.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the purpose of computing the limit on the amount of bonds which may be issued by a district pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the taxable property of the district shall be determined upon the basis that the district’s assessed value has not been reduced by the exemption of the assessed value of business inventories in the district or reduced by the homeowner’s property tax exemption.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15105.

For the purpose of the provisions of Sections 15102 and 15106 which require that the valuation as shown on the last equalized assessment roll be modified pursuant to Section 41201 or 84201, the “current year” as used in Section 41201 or 84201 shall be deemed to be the latest fiscal year for which there exists a last equalized county assessment roll as ascertained in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2050) of Part 3 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and the term “two immediately preceding years” shall be deemed to be the two fiscal years immediately preceding the fiscal year for which the last equalized county assessment roll exists. Whenever in any year it becomes necessary to determine the modification under Sections 15102 and 15106, at a time between the date when the assessment roll for that year becomes the last equalized county assessment roll ascertained under Chapter 3 and the date when the factor for the current year is certified and becomes available, the factor for the current year shall be deemed to be 1.00.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)